District of Columbia statutes.
6-1073

Repealed

Neighborhood Investment Program Target Areas.

Repealed.

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-131, § 4, 51 DCR 1797
Jan. 29, 2008, D.C. Law 17-81, § 2, 54 DCR 11885
Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-305, § 2, 56 DCR 21
Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-246, § 2, 57 DCR 7564
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9017(a), 61 DCR 9990
This section is referenced in § 6-1071, § 6-1072, § 31-5231, and § 38-1011.02.
D.C. Law 17-81 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); rewrote the lead-in text of subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “There are established the following Neighborhood Investment Program Target Areas:”; designated the existing texts of subsecs. (a)(10), (11), and (12) as (a)(10)(A), (11)(A), and (12)(A); and added subsecs. (a)(10)(B), (11)(B), and (12)(B) and (b).
D.C. Law 17-305 rewrote subsec. (a)(6)(A), which had read as follows: “(6)(A) Target Area #6—Brightwood and Upper Georgia Avenue. The Brightwood and Upper Georgia Avenue target area is defined as starting at the comer of Kennedy Street, N.W., and 16th Street, N.W., north along 16th Street, N.W., to Alaska Avenue, N.W., northeast along Alaska Avenue, N.W., to Fern Street, N.W., east along Fern Street, N.W., to Fern Place, N.W., east along Fern Place, N.W., to Blair Road, N.W., southeast along Blair Road, N.W., to 5th Street, N.W., south along 5th Street, N.W., to Kennedy Street, N.W., and west along Kennedy Street, N.W., to 16th Street, N.W.”
D.C. Law 18-246 rewrote subsec. (a)(8)(A), which formerly read:
“(8)(A) Target Area #8—Brookland and Edgewood. The Brookland and Edgewood target area is defined as starting at 4th Street, N.E., and Rhode Island Avenue, N.E., north along 4th Street, N.E., to Michigan Avenue, N.E., northeast along Michigan Avenue to South Dakota Avenue, N.E., southeast along South Dakota Avenue, N.E., to Rhode Island Avenue, N.E., and southwest along Rhode Island Avenue, N.E., to 4th Street, N.E.”
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Neighborhood Investment Amendment Temporary Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-207, March 2, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 2505).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Neighborhood Investment Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-78, January 23, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 1458).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Neighborhood Investment Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-468, July 31, 2006, 53 DCR 6761).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Neighborhood Investment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-517, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9101).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Neighborhood Investment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-8, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1468).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Neighborhood Investment Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-158, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10926).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Neighborhood Investment Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-176, November 2, 2007, 54 DCR 11221).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Neighborhood Investment Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-270, January 29, 2008, 55 DCR 1504).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Ward 4 Neighborhood Investment Fund Boundary Expansion Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-603, December 16, 2008, 56 DCR 15).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Ward 4 Neighborhood Investment Fund Boundary Expansion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-30, March 16, 2009, 56 DCR 2325).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9017(a) and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9017(a) of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.